Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2329
Retirement system; when effective.

The County Employees Retirement Act shall become effective for each county upon its adoption by the county board or on January 1, 1987, whichever is earlier.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 29, p. 410;

Laws 1975, LB 45, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 347, § 16;

Laws 1985, LB 432, § 3.

County with one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants or more, provisions applicable if retirement system not adopted, see section 23-1118.